Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-537. Extended benefits — Weekly amount.

The weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual for a week of total unemployment in his or her eligibility period shall be an amount equal to the weekly benefit amount payable to him or her during his or her applicable benefit year.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

11-10-538. Extended benefits — Total amount.

The total extended benefit amount payable to any eligible individual with respect to his or her applicable benefit year shall be the least of the following amounts:

Fifty percent (50%) of the total amount of regular benefits which are payable to him or her under this chapter in his or her applicable benefit year; or

Thirteen (13) times his or her weekly benefit amount which was payable to him or her under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year.

Notwithstanding any other provision of §§ 11-10-534 — 11-10-543, or of any federal law, including the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981, Pub. L. No. 97-35, if the benefit year of an adversely affected worker covered by a certification under Subchapter A, Chapter 2, Title II of the Trade Act of 1974, ends within an extended benefit period, the number of weeks of extended benefits that the worker would, but for this section, be entitled to in that extended benefit period shall be reduced but not below zero by the number of weeks for which the worker was entitled, during such benefit year, to trade readjustment allowances under Part I, Subchapter B, Chapter 2, Title II of the Trade Act of 1974. For purposes of this section, the terms “benefit year” and “extended benefit period” shall have the same respective meanings given to them in the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1981 (Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

U.S. Code.

The Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 referred to in this section is codified throughout the United States Code. Title II, Chapter 2 of the Trade Act of 1974 is codified as 19 U.S.C. § 2271 et seq. The Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-539. Extended benefits — Period and computations.

Whenever an extended benefit period is to become effective in this state as a result of a state “on” indicator or an extended benefit period is to be terminated in this state as a result of a state “off” indicator, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall have published an appropriate notice in newspapers of general circulation in the state.

Whenever during a period when emergency unemployment compensation benefits are being paid under the Emergency Unemployment Compensation Act of 1991 or under any subsequent extension or reenactment thereof, the state “on” indicator, as defined in § 11-10-534, triggers on a period of extended benefits, the Governor may elect not to implement the applicable state statutory provisions relative to unemployment compensation, including, but not limited to, §§ 11-10-534 — 11-10-543, and to continue the payment of benefits under the Emergency Unemployment Compensation Act of 1991 to those individuals who have exhausted their entitlement to regular unemployment compensation under state law.

Computations required by the provisions of § 11-10-534(8) shall be made by the director in accordance with regulations prescribed by the United States Secretary of Labor.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1983, No. 482, § 36; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124; Acts 1993, No. 6, § 12;
2019, No. 910, § 268.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

U.S. Code.

The Emergency Unemployment Compensation Act of 1991, referred to in this section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-540. Extended benefits — Financing.

There is imposed an additional tax on every employer as defined in § 11-10-209 except an employer electing reimbursement under § 11-10-713 or an employer required to reimburse under § 11-10-404 of one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) on taxable wages to defray the cost of extended benefits.

This extended benefit tax shall not be credited to the separate account of an employer but shall be paid into the Unemployment Compensation Fund Extended Benefits Account.

The payment of this tax shall be suspended for any rate year when the assets in this account, excluding any extended benefit taxes not yet paid, on the computation date are more than two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) of total payrolls for employment during the preceding calendar year.

“Total payrolls”, for the purposes of this section, shall exclude payrolls of employers who have elected to reimburse the fund in lieu of contributions under § 11-10-404 or § 11-10-713.

For the purposes of this section, the “assets in this account” as of the computation date shall include only extended benefit tax payments which were paid on or before June 30, the computation date.

It shall include any accounts receivable from the United States for its share of extended benefit payments that have been paid from the fund and any accounts receivable from nonprofit employers who have elected to reimburse the fund for benefits paid.

Extended benefits paid to an eligible individual shall not be charged to the separate account of each employer in the base period but shall be charged against the account.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1973, No. 350, §§ 5-7; 1975, No. 609, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, No. 81-1124.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

11-10-541. Extended benefits — Overpayments.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall establish and recover extended benefit overpayments in the manner prescribed in § 11-10-532.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1977, No. 366, § 10; 1981, No. 43, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 269.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-542. Extended benefits — Not payable under interstate benefit payment plan — Exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual shall not be eligible for extended benefits for any week if:

Extended benefits are payable for that week pursuant to an interstate claim filed in any state under the interstate benefit payment plan; and

No extended benefit period is in effect for that week in that state.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply with respect to the first two (2) weeks for which extended benefits are payable, determined without regard to this section pursuant to an interstate claim filed under the interstate benefit payment plan to the individual from the Unemployment Compensation Fund Extended Benefits Account established for the individual with respect to the benefit year.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1981, No. 43, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

11-10-543. Extended benefits — Failure to accept or seek suitable work — Definition.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 11-10-535, an individual shall be ineligible for payment of extended benefits for any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period if the Director of the Division of Workforce Services finds that during that period:

He or she failed to accept any offer of suitable work or failed to apply for any suitable work as defined under subsection (c) of this section to which he or she was referred by the director; or

He or she failed to actively engage in seeking work as prescribed under subsection (f) of this section, unless he or she did not actively engage in seeking work because he or she was before any court of the United States or of any state pursuant to a lawfully issued summons to appear for jury duty. In that event, his or her entitlement to benefits shall be decided pursuant to the able and available requirements of § 11-10-507, without regard to the disqualification provisions otherwise applicable under subsection (b) of this section.

Any individual who has been found ineligible for extended benefits by reason of the provision in subsection (a) of this section shall also be ineligible for extended benefits beginning with the first day of the week following the week in which the failure occurred and until he or she has been employed in each of four (4) subsequent weeks, whether or not consecutive, and has earned remuneration equal to not less than four (4) times his or her extended weekly benefit amount.

For purposes of this section, the term “suitable work” means, with respect to any individual, any work that is within the individual's capabilities, provided that:

The gross average weekly remuneration payable for the work exceeds the sum of the individual's average weekly benefit amount, as determined under § 11-10-537, plus the amount, if any, of supplemental unemployment benefits, as defined in section 501(c)(17)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 payable to the individual for that week; and

The work pays wages equal to the higher of:

The minimum wages provided by section 6(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, without regard to any exemption; or

The state or local minimum wage.

No individual shall be denied extended benefits for failure to accept an offer of, or referral to, any job which meets the definition of suitability as described in subsection (c) of this section if:

The position was not offered to the individual in writing and was not listed with the employment service;

The failure could not result in a denial of benefits under the definition of suitable work for regular benefit claimants in § 11-10-515 to the extent that the criteria of suitability in § 11-10-515 are not inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or

The individual furnishes satisfactory evidence to the director that his or her prospects for obtaining work in his or her customary occupation within a reasonably short period are good. If evidence is deemed satisfactory for this purpose, the determination of whether any work is suitable with respect to an individual shall be made in accordance with the definition of suitable work in § 11-10-515 without regard to the definition specified by this section.

Notwithstanding the provision of this section to the contrary, no work shall be deemed to be suitable work for an individual that does not accord with the labor standard provisions required by section 3304(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 and set forth herein under § 11-10-515.

For the purposes of subdivision (a)(2) of this section, an individual shall be treated as actively engaged in seeking work during any week if:

The individual has engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to obtain work during the week; and

The individual furnishes tangible evidence that he or she has engaged in effort during the week.

The employment service shall refer any claimant entitled to extended benefits under this chapter to any suitable work which meets the criteria prescribed in subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

An individual shall not be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period if the individual has been disqualified for regular benefits under this chapter because he or she voluntarily left work, was discharged for misconduct, or refused an offer of suitable work unless the disqualification imposed for those reasons was satisfied with employment.

The Division of Workforce Services shall enforce this section.

The director shall make quarterly reports to the Legislative Council on the division's efforts to enforce this section, including without limitation:

The number of cases of benefit recipients accused of not accepting valid job offers;

The disposition of cases reported under subdivision (j)(1) of this section; and

The policies and steps the division is taking to eliminate and reduce refusals to accept valid job offers.

The division shall facilitate electronic reporting of a benefit recipient who refuses to take an offered job either through outright refusal, failing a drug test, or other means.

The division may facilitate electronic reporting under subdivision (k)(1) of this section by an easy-to-understand and -use website created for the purpose or created for another purpose that facilitates easy reporting by potential employers and others.

The division shall notify periodically an employer regarding the method for reporting a benefit recipient who fails to take a job either through outright refusal, failing a drug test, or other means.

The division may notify an employer at least two times (2) per year regarding the method for reporting under subdivision (l)(1) of this section by electronic means that are economically feasible and may be a part of another communication to the employer.

An employer that provides a report with the belief that it is true of a failure to take a job, whether by outright refusal, failure to show up for work or interview, failing a drug test, or other means is not liable for the reporting.

This section provides a complete defense for an employer in a civil proceeding arising from an employer's actions under this section.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1981, No. 43, § 19; 1985, No. 8, § 31; 1985, No. 9, § 31; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124; Acts 2013, No. 1040, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 270-273.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (i) through (m).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a); substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (i); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (j) through (l).

U.S. Code.

Sections 501 and 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 referred to in this section are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 501 and 3304, respectively. Section 6 of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 206.

11-10-544. Reciprocal arrangements with state and federal agencies.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services is authorized to enter into reciprocal arrangements with appropriate and duly authorized agencies of other states or of the federal government, or both, whereby:

Services performed by an individual for a single employing unit for which services are customarily performed in more than one (1) state shall be deemed to be services performed entirely within any one (1) of the states:

In which any part of the individual's service is performed;

In which the individual has his or her residence; or

In which the employing unit maintains a place of business, provided there is in effect, as to the services, an election, approved by the agency charged with the administration of the state's unemployment compensation law, pursuant to which all the services performed by the individual for the employing unit are deemed to be performed entirely within the state;

Potential rights to benefits accumulated under the unemployment compensation laws of one (1) or more states or under one (1) or more laws of the federal government, or both, may constitute the basis for the payment of benefits through a single appropriate agency under terms that the director finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests and will not result in any substantial loss to the fund;

Wages or services, upon the basis of which an individual may become entitled to benefits under an unemployment compensation law of another state or of the federal government, shall be deemed to be wages for insured work for the purpose of determining his or her rights to benefits under this chapter. Wages for insured work, on the basis of which an individual may become entitled to benefits under this chapter, shall be deemed to be wages or services on the basis of which unemployment compensation under the law of another state or of the federal government is payable.

No arrangement shall be entered into unless it contains provisions for reimbursements to the fund for the benefits paid under this chapter upon the basis of the wages or services and provisions for reimbursements from the fund for such of the compensation paid under the other law upon the basis of wages for insured work as the director finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests; and

Contributions due under this chapter with respect to wages for insured work shall, for the purposes of §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-722, be deemed to have been paid to the fund as of the date payment was made as contributions under another state or federal unemployment compensation law, but no such arrangement shall be entered into unless it contains such provisions for reimbursement to the fund of the contributions and the actual earnings thereon as the director finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests.

Reimbursements paid from the fund pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall be deemed to be benefits for the purpose of §§ 11-10-501 — 11-10-506, 11-10-517, and 11-10-801 — 11-10-804.

The director is authorized to make to other state or federal agencies and to receive from other state or federal agencies reimbursements from or to the fund in accordance with arrangements entered into pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

The administration of this chapter and of other state and federal unemployment compensation and public employment service laws will be promoted by cooperation between this state and other states and the appropriate federal agencies in exchanging services and making available facilities and information.

The director is authorized to make such investigations, secure and transmit such information, make available such services and facilities, and exercise such of the other powers provided herein with respect to the administration of this chapter as he or she deems necessary or appropriate to facilitate the administration of any unemployment compensation or public employment service law.

In like manner, the director is authorized to accept and utilize information, services, and facilities made available to this state by the agency charged with the administration of any other unemployment compensation or public employment service law.

To the extent permissible under the laws and United States Constitution, the director is authorized to enter into or cooperate in arrangements whereby facilities and services provided under this chapter and facilities and services provided under the unemployment compensation law of any foreign government may be utilized for the taking of claims and the payment of benefits under this chapter or under a similar law of the government.

The director is authorized to enter into reciprocal arrangements with appropriate and duly authorized agencies of other states or the federal government, or both, and to sign specific agreements to carry out the provisions of arrangements, and to enter into agreement with any federal agency to pay benefits as an agent of the United States Government under any law passed by the United States Congress for the purpose of paying benefits to employees of the United States or persons entitled to benefits by reason of service in the United States Armed Forces.

The director is authorized to make application for loans and grants with any governmental agency under any act of the United States Congress that authorizes the making of such loans and grants.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 18; 1955, No. 395, § 28; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1121; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 274.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of (a).

Subchapter 6
— Shared Work Plans

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was enacted as an amendment to Acts 1941, No. 391, § 3(e). However, that provision had already been repealed by Acts 1985, No. 8, § 4 and No. 9, § 4, which took effect prior to the amendment.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985, Nos. 329, § 4 and 813, § 4: July 1, 1985. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to aid the economic growth and well being of the State, and to reduce the number of workers who might otherwise become totally unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 753, § 30: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections to the Shared Work plan provisions which enable employers to avoid layoffs and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995, No. 519, § 14: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2013, No. 956, § 10: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits; that the state's unemployment insurance program must remain in conformity with federal law requirements; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would interfere with continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2015, No. 907, § 15: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided:

“(a)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that federal law requires the implementation of state-level workforce development acts to authorize federal funding for workforce development programs; that the Arkansas Workforce Development Board must begin work immediately to prepare for the inauguration of local workforce development boards; that the first phase of work by the Arkansas Workforce Development Board must be completed to coincide with the beginning of the 2015-2016 fiscal year on July 1, 2015. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and § 15-4-37-3704 being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

“(b)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 2015, is essential to the inauguration of the programs for which this act is provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 2015, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential programs created in the act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and, except for § 15-4-3704, this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-601. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall apply:

“Affected group” means two (2) or more employees designated by an employer to participate in a shared work plan.

“Sub-group” means a group of employees which constitutes at least ten percent (10%) of the employees in an affected group;

“Approved plan” means an employer's voluntary written plan for reducing unemployment under which a specified group of employees shares the work remaining after their normal weekly hours of work are reduced, which plan meets the requirements of § 11-10-604, and which plan has been approved in writing by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services;

“Fringe benefits” includes, but is not limited to, such advantages as health insurance (hospital, medical, and dental services, etc.), retirement benefits under defined benefit pension plans as defined in section 3(35) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, paid vacation and holidays, sick leave, etc., which are incidents of employment in addition to the cash remuneration earned;

“Normal weekly hours of work” means the normal hours of work for full-time and permanent part-time employees in the affected group when their employing unit is operating on its normal, full-time basis, not to exceed forty (40) hours and not including overtime;

“Shared work benefits” means the unemployment compensation benefits payable to employees in an affected group under an approved plan as distinguished from the unemployment benefits otherwise payable under other provisions of this chapter;

“Shared work employer” means an employer with a shared work plan in effect. An individual who, or an employing unit which, succeeds to or acquires, pursuant to § 11-10-710, an organization, trade, or business with a shared work plan in effect automatically becomes a shared work employer and adopts the plan if the individual or employing unit ratifies, in writing, the previously approved plan; and

“Unemployment compensation” means the unemployment benefits payable under this chapter other than shared work benefits and includes any amounts payable pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 34;
2019, No. 910, § 275.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (2).

U.S. Code.

Section 3(35) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, referred to in this section, is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 1002(35).

11-10-602. Applicability.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, provisions of this chapter that are applicable to unemployment compensation claimants shall apply to shared work unemployment compensation claimants.

An individual who files an initial claim for shared work unemployment compensation benefits shall be provided, if eligible therefor, a monetary determination of entitlement to shared work unemployment compensation benefits and shall serve a waiting week.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n.

11-10-603. Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall preclude an otherwise eligible claimant from drawing total or partial unemployment benefits when he or she has exhausted his or her shared work benefits.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n.

11-10-604. Criteria for approval.

An employer wishing to participate in a shared work program shall submit a signed written shared work compensation plan to the Director of the Division of Workforce Services for approval.

The director shall approve a shared work unemployment compensation plan only if the following criteria are met:

The plan:

Applies to and identifies the specified affected group; and

Includes an estimate of the number of layoffs that might occur absent participation in the shared work program;

The employees in the affected group or groups are identified by name, Social Security number, and by any other information required by the director;

The usual weekly hours of work for employees in the affected group or groups are reduced by not less than ten percent (10%) and not more than forty percent (40%);

Health benefits and retirement benefits under defined benefit pension plans, as defined in section 3(35) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-406, and other fringe benefits will continue to be provided to employees in the affected group or groups as though their work weeks had not been reduced.

However, if the employer reduces the level of benefits under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section for its employees who are not in the shared work group, the level of benefits may be reduced by a like amount for the employer's shared work employees;

The plan certifies that the aggregate reduction in work hours is in lieu of all layoffs that would have affected at least ten percent (10%) of the employees in the affected group or groups to which the plan applies and that would have resulted in an equivalent reduction in work hours;

During the previous four (4) months, the workforce in the affected group has not been reduced by temporary layoffs of more than ten percent (10%) of the workers;

The plan applies to at least ten percent (10%) of the employees in the affected group.

If the plan applies to all employees in the affected group, the plan provides equal treatment to all employees of the group.

If the affected group is divided into subgroups, the plan provides equal treatment to employees within each subgroup;

In the case of employees represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, the plan is approved in writing by the collective bargaining agent.

If the certification of an exclusive bargaining representative has been appealed, the bargaining representative shall be considered to be the exclusive bargaining representative for work sharing plan purposes.

The plan shall contain a certification by the employer that the employer has made the proposed plan available to:

Each employee in the affected group for inspection; or

If applicable, to the exclusive bargaining representative.

The plan shall include:

A description of how the plan was made available; and

If advance notice of the plan was not feasible, an explanation of why advance notice was not feasible;

The plan includes a certified statement by the employer that the terms and implementation of the shared work plan are consistent with any obligations the employer has under applicable federal and state laws.

An employee who joins an affected group after the approval of the shared work plan is automatically covered under the previously approved plan, effective the week that the director receives written notice from the shared work employer that the employee has joined;

On the most recent computation date preceding the date of submission of the shared work plan for approval, the total of all contributions paid on the employing unit's own behalf and credited to its account for all previous periods equaled or exceeded the regular benefits charged to its account for all previous periods;

The plan shall not serve as a subsidy of seasonal employment during the off-season nor as a subsidy of temporary part-time employment or intermittent employment; and

The employer agrees to:

Furnish reports relating to the proper conduct of the plan;

Allow the director or his or her authorized representatives access to all records necessary to verify the plan before approval; and

Allow the director to monitor and evaluate application of the plan after approval.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 7; 1991, No. 100, §§ 35, 36; 2013, No. 956, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 276.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

U.S. Code.

Section 3(35) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, referred to in this section, is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 1002 (35).

11-10-605. Approval or rejection.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall approve or reject a plan in writing within thirty (30) days of its receipt.

Only one (1) plan may be approved for any one (1) employer during any twelve-month period.

The reason for rejection shall be final and non-appealable, but the employer shall be allowed to submit another plan for approval not earlier than fifteen (15) days from the date of the last rejection.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 8; 1991, No. 100, § 37; 2019, No. 910, §
277.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-606. Effective date and duration of plan.

A plan shall be effective on the date specified in the plan or on a date mutually agreed upon by the employer and the Director of the Division of Workforce Services but no earlier than the date of approval of the plan by the director.

It shall expire at the end of the twelfth full calendar month after its effective date or on the date specified in the plan if the date is earlier, provided that the plan is not previously revoked by the director.

If a plan is revoked by the director, it shall terminate on the date specified in the director's written order of revocation.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 9; 1991, No. 100, § 38; 2019, No. 910, § 278.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-607. Revocation of approval.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services may revoke approval of a plan for good cause.

The revocation order shall be in writing and shall specify the date the revocation is effective and the reasons therefor.

Good cause shall include, but not be limited to, failure to comply with the assurances given in the plan, unreasonable revision of productivity standards for the affected group, conduct or occurrences tending to defeat the intent and effective operation of the plan, and violation of any criteria on which approval of the plan was based.

The action may be taken at any time by the director on his or her own motion, on the motion of any of the affected group's employees, or on the motion of the appropriate collective bargaining agent.

However, the director shall review the operation of each qualified employer plan at least once during the twelve-month period that the plan is in effect to assure its compliance with the requirements of these provisions.

Revocation of a plan for good cause by the director shall preclude approval of any subsequent plan submitted by the revoked plan employer during the twelve-month period beginning on the date of the revocation order.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 10; 1991, No. 100, § 39; 2019, No. 910, § 279.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

11-10-608. Modification of an approved plan.

An operational, approved, shared work plan may be modified by the employer with the acquiescence of employee representatives if the modification is not substantial and is in conformity with the plan approved by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, but the modifications must be reported promptly to the director.

If the hours of work are increased or decreased substantially beyond the level in the original plan or if any other conditions are changed substantially, the director shall approve or disapprove the modifications without changing the expiration date of the original plan.

If the substantial modifications do not meet the requirements for approval, the director shall disallow that portion of the plan in writing as specified in § 11-10-607.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 40; 2019, No. 910, § 280.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).